Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7676.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 42-46-2, 42-46-5, 42-46-6, 42-46-7 and 42-46-13 of the General
Laws in Chapter 42-46 entitled "Open Meetings" are hereby amended to read as follows:
42-46-2. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) Advisory body” means any department, agency, commission, committee, board,
council, bureau, or authority, or any subdivision thereof, of state or municipal government, or other
like body that does not have decision-making authority and whose primary purpose is to consider
an issue or issues designated by the appointing entity so as to provide such authority with advice
or recommendations concerning the formulation of any public policy or legislation or other matter
assigned to the advisory body.
(1)(2) “Meeting” means the convening of a public body to discuss and/or act upon a matter
over which the public body has supervision, control, jurisdiction, or advisory power. As used
herein, the term “meeting” expressly includes, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, so-
called “workshop,” “working,” or “work” sessions.
(2)(3) “Open call” means a public announcement by the chairperson of the committee that
the meeting is going to be held in executive session and the chairperson must indicate which
exception of § 42-46-5 is being involved.
(3)(4) “Open forum” means the designated portion of an open meeting, if any, on a properly
posted notice reserved for citizens to address comments to a public body relating to matters

affecting the public business.
(4)(5) “Prevailing plaintiff” includes those persons and entities deemed “prevailing parties”
pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 1988.
(5)(6) “Public body” means any department, agency, commission, committee, board,
council, bureau, or authority, or any subdivision thereof, of state or municipal government or the
board of directors of any library that funded at least twenty-five percent (25%) of its operational
budget in the prior budget year with public funds, and shall include all authorities defined in § 42-
35-1. For purposes of this section, any political party, organization, or unit thereof meeting or
convening is not and should not be considered to be a public body; provided, however, that no such
meeting shall be used to circumvent the requirements of this chapter.
(6)(7) “Quorum,” unless otherwise defined by applicable law, means a simple majority of
the membership of a public body.
42-46-5. Purposes for which meeting may be closed — Use of electronic
communications — Judicial proceedings — Disruptive conduct.
(a) A public body may hold a meeting closed to the public pursuant to § 42-46-4 for one
or more of the following purposes:
(1) Any discussions of the job performance, character, or physical or mental health of a
person or persons provided that the person or persons affected shall have been notified in advance
in writing and advised that they may require that the discussion be held at an open meeting.
Failure to provide notification shall render any action taken against the person or persons
affected null and void. Before going into a closed meeting pursuant to this subsection, the public
body shall state for the record that any persons to be discussed have been so notified and this
statement shall be noted in the minutes of the meeting.
(2) Sessions pertaining to collective bargaining or litigation, or work sessions pertaining to
collective bargaining or litigation.
(3) Discussion regarding the matter of security including, but not limited to, the deployment
of security personnel or devices.
(4) Any investigative proceedings regarding allegations of misconduct, either civil or
criminal.
(5) Any discussions or considerations related to the acquisition or lease of real property for
public purposes, or of the disposition of publicly held property wherein advanced public
information would be detrimental to the interest of the public.
(6) Any discussions related to or concerning a prospective business or industry locating in
the state of Rhode Island when an open meeting would have a detrimental effect on the interest of
LC004865 - Page 2 of 12

the public.
(7) A matter related to the question of the investment of public funds where the premature
disclosure would adversely affect the public interest. Public funds shall include any investment
plan or matter related thereto, including, but not limited to, state lottery plans for new promotions.
(8) Any executive sessions of a local school committee exclusively for the purposes: (i) Of
conducting student disciplinary hearings; or (ii) Of reviewing other matters that relate to the privacy
of students and their records, including all hearings of the various juvenile hearing boards of any
municipality; provided, however, that any affected student shall have been notified in advance in
writing and advised that the student may require that the discussion be held in an open meeting.
Failure to provide notification shall render any action taken against the student or students
affected null and void. Before going into a closed meeting pursuant to this subsection, the public
body shall state for the record that any students to be discussed have been so notified and this
statement shall be noted in the minutes of the meeting.
(9) Any hearings on, or discussions of, a grievance filed pursuant to a collective bargaining
agreement.
(10) Any discussion of the personal finances of a prospective donor to a library.
(b) No meeting of members of a public body or use of electronic communication, including
telephonic communication and telephone conferencing, shall be used to circumvent the spirit or
requirements of this chapter; provided, however, these meetings and discussions are not prohibited.
(1) Provided, further however, that discussions of a public body via electronic
communication, including telephonic communication and telephone conferencing, shall be
permitted only to schedule a meeting, except as provided in this subsection.
(2) Provided, further however, that a member of a public body may participate by use of
electronic communication or telephone communication while on active duty in the armed services
of the United States.
(3) Provided, further however, that a member of that public body, who has a disability as
defined in chapter 87 of this title and:
(i) Cannot attend meetings of that public body solely by reason of the member’s disability;
and
(ii) Cannot otherwise participate in the meeting without the use of electronic
communication or telephone communication as reasonable accommodation, may participate by use
of electronic communication or telephone communication in accordance with the process below.
(4) The governor’s commission on disabilities is authorized and directed to:
(i) Establish rules and regulations for determining whether a member of a public body is
LC004865 - Page 3 of 12

not otherwise able to participate in meetings of that public body without the use of electronic
communication or telephone communication as a reasonable accommodation due to that member’s
disability;
(ii) Grant a waiver that allows a member to participate by electronic communication or
telephone communication only if the member’s disability would prevent the member from being
physically present at the meeting location, and the use of such communication is the only
reasonable accommodation; and
(iii) Any waiver decisions shall be a matter of public record.
(5) The university of Rhode Island board of trustees members, established pursuant to §
16-32-2, are authorized to participate remotely in open public meetings of the board; provided,
however, that:
(i) The remote members and all persons present at the meeting location are clearly audible
and visible to each other;
(ii) A quorum of the body is participating;
(iii) If videoconferencing is used to conduct a meeting, the public notice for the meeting
shall inform the public that videoconferencing will be used and include instructions on how the
public can access the virtual meeting; and
(iv) The board shall adopt rules defining the requirements of remote participation including
its use for executive session, and the conditions by which a member is authorized to participate
remotely. Notwithstanding the provisions of this chapter, members of an advisory body defined in
§ 42-46-2(1) may participate in a public meeting using videoconferencing; provided, however, that:
(i) The public body shall provide members of the public with the opportunity to attend the
public meeting contemporaneously using the platform for videoconferencing when any member or
members of the public body participate using videoconferencing;
(ii) The videoconferencing platform provided to members of the public shall be without
subscription, toll, or similar charge to join the public meeting;
(iii) If the public body by practice, statute, ordinance, or policy, provides an opportunity
for members of the public in attendance to provide input during the public meeting, an effective
means of communication between all members of the public body and all members of the public in
attendance, either in person or by videoconferencing, shall be provided;
(iv) Notice of the meeting shall be provided in accordance with § 42-46-6. Such notice
shall also include;
(A) What members of the public body will be participating by videoconferencing;
(B) Instructions for the public to attend and participate in the meeting by means of
LC004865 - Page 4 of 12

videoconferencing pursuant to subsection (b)(5)(ii) of this section; and
(C) A valid online link or an email address where a member of the public can request and
obtain a link to a recording of the meeting pursuant to subsection (b)(5)(x) of this section;
(v) A member of the public body who participates in a meeting using videoconferencing
shall not be deemed present for purposes of a quorum or voting if the member is not visually present
on camera;
(vi) A member of the public body who participates in a public meeting using
videoconferencing shall:
(A) Identify themselves when the meeting is convened; and
(B) Be able to hear the conduct of the meeting and be heard throughout the meeting;
(vii) All non-unanimous votes taken during a public meeting with members participating
using videoconferencing shall be taken by roll call;
(viii) If a quorum of the members of a public body are participating using
videoconferencing from the same physical location, members of the public shall be allowed to
attend the meeting at the physical location;
(ix) Whenever a public meeting being conducted with members of the public body
participating using videoconferencing is interrupted by the more than momentary failure,
disconnection or in the chair’s determination, unacceptable degradation of the videoconferencing
technology, the meeting shall adjourn;
(x) If any members of the public body participate using videoconferencing, the public body
shall ensure that the meeting is recorded, and make a recording of the meeting available online
within twenty-four (24) hours of adjournment of the meeting, excepting weekends and holidays,
and retain a link to the recording on a public website for public inspection, without subscription,
toll, or similar charge, for a period of five (5) years; and
(xi) When using videoconferencing technology, the public body shall comply with
nondiscrimination on the basis of disability requirements of Rhode Island Constitution article I
section 2 and applicable federal and state nondiscrimination laws to include 29 U.S.C. § 794,
chapter 87 of this title, and chapter 24 of title 11. Public bodies shall adopt procedures for requesting
reasonable accommodations and provide information about that procedure on its published
agendas.
(6) The Rhode Island Life Science Hub board of directors, established pursuant to § 23-
99-4, is authorized to participate remotely in open public meetings of the board, in accordance with
the provisions of § 23-99-4(c). The University of Rhode Island board of trustees members and the
Rhode Island Life Sciences Hub board of directors are authorized to participate in public meetings
LC004865 - Page 5 of 12

of those bodies using videoconferencing pursuant to the requirements set forth in § 42-46-5(b)(5).
(7) Effective January 1, 2027, all city and town councils and school boards and committees
shall provide a livestream of their meetings; provided, however, that:
(i) The livestream shall be without subscription, toll, or similar charge to join the public
meeting;
(ii) Notice of the meeting shall be provided in accordance with § 42-46-6. Such notice shall
also include a link to the livestream, and a valid online link or an email address where a member
of the public can request and obtain a link to a recording of the meeting pursuant to subsection
(b)(7)(iii) of this section;
(iii) The public body shall ensure that the livestream of the meeting is recorded, and make
a recording of the meeting available online within twenty-four (24) hours of adjournment of the
meeting, excepting weekends and holidays, and retain a link to the recording on a public website
for public inspection, without subscription, toll, or similar charge, for a period of five (5) years;
and
(iv) Nothing contained in this subsection shall allow members of said bodies to participate
using electronic communication or telephone communication, except as prescribed by § 42-46-
5(b)(1) through (4).
(8)(i) Effective January 1, 2028, all city and town councils and school boards and
committees that by practice, statute, ordinance, or policy, provide an opportunity for members of
the public in attendance to provide input during the public meeting, shall also provide an effective
means of participation by members of the public by videoconferencing.
(ii) In addition to the meeting notice requirements contained in subsection (b)(7)(ii) of this
section, the notice of any meetings subject to subsection (b)(8)(i) of this section shall include
instructions for the public to participate by videoconferencing.
(iii) When using videoconferencing technology, the public body must comply with the
nondiscrimination on the basis of disability requirements of Rhode Island Constitution article I
section 2 and applicable federal and state nondiscrimination laws to include 29 U.S.C. § 794,
chapter 87 of this title, and chapter 24 of title 11. Public bodies must adopt procedures for
requesting a reasonable accommodation and provide information about that procedure on its
published agendas.
(vi) Nothing contained in this subsection shall allow members of said bodies to participate
using electronic communication or telephone communication, except as prescribed by § 42-46-
5(b)(1) through(4).
(c) This chapter shall not apply to proceedings of the judicial branch of state government
LC004865 - Page 6 of 12

or probate court or municipal court proceedings in any city or town.
(d) This chapter shall not prohibit the removal of any person who willfully disrupts a
meeting to the extent that orderly conduct of the meeting is seriously compromised.
42-46-6. Notice.
(a) All public bodies shall give written notice of their regularly scheduled meetings at the
beginning of each calendar year. The notice shall include the dates, times, and places of the
meetings and shall be provided to members of the public upon request and to the secretary of state
at the beginning of each calendar year in accordance with subsection (f).
(b) Public bodies shall give supplemental written public notice of any meeting within a
minimum of forty-eight (48) hours, excluding weekends and state holidays in the count of hours,
before the date. This notice shall include the date the notice was posted; the date, time, and place
of the meeting; and a statement specifying the nature of the business to be discussed. Copies of the
notice shall be maintained by the public body for a minimum of one year. Nothing contained herein
shall prevent a public body, other than a school committee, from adding additional items to the
agenda by majority vote of the members. School committees may, however, add items for
informational purposes only, pursuant to a request, submitted in writing, by a member of the public
during the public comment session of the school committee’s meetings. Said informational items
may not be voted upon unless they have been posted in accordance with the provisions of this
section. Such additional items shall be for informational purposes only and may not be voted on
except where necessary to address an unexpected occurrence that requires immediate action to
protect the public or to refer the matter to an appropriate committee or to another body or official.
All documents to be discussed at an open meeting of a public body shall be posted or linked with
the electronic filing of the agenda submitted to the secretary of state pursuant to § 42-46-6(f).
Notwithstanding any provisions of § 38-2-2(4), any documents reviewed, considered, or submitted
at a public meeting of a public body shall be deemed public and shall also be made available upon
request to any member of the public while present at the meeting.
(c) Written public notice shall include, but need not be limited to, posting a copy of the
notice at the principal office of the public body holding the meeting, or if no principal office exists,
at the building in which the meeting is to be held, and in at least one other prominent place within
the governmental unit, and electronic filing of the notice with the secretary of state pursuant to
subsection (f); however, nothing contained herein shall prevent a public body from holding an
emergency meeting, upon an affirmative vote of the majority of the members of the body when the
meeting is deemed necessary to address an unexpected occurrence that requires immediate action
to protect the public. If an emergency meeting is called, a meeting notice and agenda shall be posted
LC004865 - Page 7 of 12

as soon as practicable and shall be electronically filed with the secretary of state pursuant to
subsection (f) and, upon meeting, the public body shall state for the record and minutes why the
matter must be addressed in less than forty-eight (48) hours in accordance with subsection (b) of
this section and only discuss the issue or issues that created the need for an emergency meeting.
Nothing contained herein shall be used in the circumvention of the spirit and requirements of this
chapter.
(d) Nothing within this chapter shall prohibit any public body, or the members thereof,
from responding to comments initiated by a member of the public during a properly noticed open
forum even if the subject matter of a citizen’s comments or discussions were not previously posted,
provided such matters shall be for informational purposes only and may not be voted on except
where necessary to address an unexpected occurrence that requires immediate action to protect the
public or to refer the matter to an appropriate committee or to another body or official. Nothing
contained in this chapter requires any public body to hold an open-forum session to entertain or
respond to any topic nor does it prohibit any public body from limiting comment on any topic at
such an open-forum session. No public body, or the members thereof, may use this section to
circumvent the spirit or requirements of this chapter.
(e) A school committee may add agenda items not appearing in the published notice
required by this section under the following conditions:
(1) The revised agenda is electronically filed with the secretary of state pursuant to
subsection (f), and is posted on the school district’s website and the two (2) public locations
required by this section at least forty-eight (48) hours in advance of the meeting in accordance with
subsection (b) of this section;
(2) The new agenda items were unexpected and could not have been added in time for
newspaper publication;
(3) Upon meeting, the public body states for the record and minutes why the agenda items
could not have been added in time for newspaper publication and need to be addressed at the
meeting;
(4) A formal process is available to provide timely notice of the revised agenda to any
person who has requested that notice, and the school district has taken reasonable steps to make the
public aware of this process; and
(5) The published notice shall include a statement that any changes in the agenda will be
posted on the school district’s website and the two (2) public locations required by this section and
will be electronically filed with the secretary of state at least forty-eight (48) hours in advance of
the meeting in accordance with subsection (b) of this section.
LC004865 - Page 8 of 12

(f) All notices required by this section to be filed with the secretary of state shall be
electronically transmitted to the secretary of state in accordance with rules and regulations that shall
be promulgated by the secretary of state. This requirement of the electronic transmission and filing
of notices with the secretary of state shall take effect one year after this subsection takes effect.
(g) If a public body fails to transmit notices in accordance with this section, then any
aggrieved person may file a complaint with the attorney general in accordance with § 42-46-8.
42-46-7. Minutes.
(a) All public bodies shall keep written minutes of all their meetings. The minutes shall
include, but need not be limited to:
(1) The date, time, and place of the meeting;
(2) The members of the public body recorded as either present or absent;
(3) A record by individual members of any vote taken; and
(4) Any other information relevant to the business of the public body that any member of
the public body requests be included or reflected in the minutes.;
(5) Which members of the public body, if any, participated using videoconferencing
pursuant to § 42-46-5(b); and
(6) The email address where a member of the public can request access to a recording of
any public meeting conducted using videoconferencing pursuant to § 42-46-5(b)(5).
(b)(1) A record of all votes taken at all meetings of public bodies, listing how each member
voted on each issue, shall be a public record and shall be available to the public at the office of the
public body within two (2) weeks of the date of the vote. The minutes shall be public records and
unofficial minutes shall be available to the public at the office of the public body within thirty-five
(35) days of the meeting or at the next regularly scheduled meeting, whichever is earlier, except
where the disclosure would be inconsistent with §§ 42-46-4 and 42-46-5 or where the public body
by majority vote extends the time period for the filing of the minutes and publicly states the reason.
(2) In addition to the provisions of subsection (b)(1), all volunteer fire companies,
associations, fire district companies, or any other organization currently engaged in the mission of
extinguishing fires and preventing fire hazards, whether it is incorporated or not, and whether it is
a paid department or not, shall post unofficial minutes of their meetings within twenty-one (21)
days of the meeting, but not later than seven (7) days prior to the next regularly scheduled meeting,
whichever is earlier, on the secretary of state’s website. Except for discussions related to finances,
the provisions of this subsection shall not apply to a volunteer fire company if the matters of the
volunteer fire company are under the supervision, control, or jurisdiction of another public body.
(c) The minutes of a closed session shall be made available at the next regularly scheduled
LC004865 - Page 9 of 12

meeting unless the majority of the body votes to keep the minutes closed pursuant to §§ 42-46-4
and 42-46-5.
(d) All public bodies shall keep official and/or approved minutes of all meetings of the
body and shall file a copy of the minutes of all open meetings with the secretary of state for
inspection by the public within thirty-five (35) days of the meeting; provided that this subsection
shall not apply to public bodies whose responsibilities are solely advisory in nature.
(e) All minutes and unofficial minutes required by this section to be filed with the secretary
of state shall be electronically transmitted to the secretary of state in accordance with rules and
regulations that shall be promulgated by the secretary of state. If a public body fails to transmit
minutes or unofficial minutes in accordance with this subsection, then any aggrieved person may
file a complaint with the attorney general in accordance with § 42-46-8.
42-46-13. Accessibility for persons with disabilities.
(a) All public bodies, to comply with the nondiscrimination on the basis of disability
requirements of R.I. Const., Art. I, § 2 and applicable federal and state nondiscrimination laws (29
U.S.C. § 794, chapter 87 of this title, and chapter 24 of title 11), shall develop a transition plan
setting forth the steps necessary to ensure that all open meetings of said public bodies are accessible
to persons with disabilities.
(b) The state building code standards committee shall, by September 1, 1989, adopt an
accessibility of meetings for persons with disabilities standard that includes provisions ensuring
that the meeting location is accessible to and usable by all persons with disabilities.
(c) This section does not require the public body to make each of its existing facilities
accessible to and usable by persons with disabilities so long as all meetings required to be open to
the public pursuant to this chapter are held in accessible facilities by the dates specified in
subsection (e).
(d) The public body may comply with the requirements of this section through such means
as reassignment of meetings to accessible facilities, alteration of existing facilities, or construction
of new facilities, or meeting online if the public body is advisory and complies with the
requirements of § 42-46-5. The public body is not required to make structural changes in existing
facilities where other methods are effective in achieving compliance with this section.
(e) The public body shall comply with the obligations established under this section by July
1, 1990, except that where structural changes in facilities are necessary in order to comply with this
section, such changes shall be made by December 30, 1991, but in any event as expeditiously as
possible unless an extension is granted by the state building commissioner for good cause.
(f) Each municipal government and school district shall, with the assistance of the state
LC004865 - Page 10 of 12

building commission, complete a transition plan covering the location of meetings for all public
bodies under their jurisdiction. Each chief executive of each city or town and the superintendent of
schools will submit their transition plan to the governor’s commission on disabilities for review
and approval. The governor’s commission on disabilities with assistance from the state building
commission shall approve or modify, with the concurrence of the municipal government or school
district, the transition plans.
(g) The provisions of §§ 45-13-7 — 45-13-10, inclusive, shall not apply to this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004865
========
LC004865 - Page 11 of 12